Louisiana, session 2026, SB395.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 19:2.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2.3. Expropriation by the state; certain foreign adversaries
When a property is owned by the country of China, the Chinese
Communist Party (CCP), a corporation incorporated in the country of China,
or a person who is a citizen of the country of China, the state shall expropriate
the property, which shall be deemed to be an exercise of its state governmental
powers. The taking shall be considered as necessary for a public purpose
pursuant to Article I, Section 4 of the Louisiana Constitution.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-646 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 395